cs: Typ držáku J-Cup: Plochý; Snížený; Běžná; Sendvič; Jiné
fi: J-kuppityyppi: Tasainen; Laskettu; Tavallinen; Sandwich; Muu
hu: J-tartó típusa: Flat; Lowered; Normál; Sandwich; Egyéb
th: ประเภทเจคัพ: ราบ; แบบปลายต่ำ; แบบปกติ; แผ่นสำเร็จรูป; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ držiaka činiek: Plochý; Znížený; Bežný; Sendvičový; Iné
ko: J컵 유형: 플랫; 낮춤; 레귤러; 샌드위치; 기타
sv: Typ J-kopp: Platt; Sänkt; Vanligt; Sandwich; Övrigt
nl: J-cuptype: Vlak; Verlaagd; Normaal; Sandwich; Andere
el: Τύπος J-Cup: Επίπεδη; Χαμηλωμένο; Κανονική; Πολυστρωματικό; Άλλο
zh-TW: J 杯型: 平坦; 降低; 一般; 層壓; 其他
vi: Loại cúp ngực J: Phẳng; Hạ thấp; Loại thông thường; Bánh sandwich; Khác
de: J-Cup-Typ: Flach; Abgesenkt; Normal; Sandwich; Sonstiges
tr: J-Cup Tipi: Düz; Alçaltılmış; Normal; Sandviç; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de J-Cup: Plano; Rebaixado; Tradicionais; Sanduíche; Outro
hr-HR: Tip kuke u obliku slova J: Ravna; Spuštena; Uobičajena; Sendvič; Ostalo
fr: Type de J-Cup: Plate; Abaissé; Normale; Sandwich; Autre
nb: J-Cup-type: Flat; Senket; Vanlig; Sandwich; Annet
pl: Typ miseczki J: Płaski; Opuszczony; Zwyczajne; Kanapka; Inne
pt-BR: Suporte em formato de J: Plana; Abaixado; Regular; Sanduíche; Outro
da: J-Cup-type: Flad; Sænket; Almindelig; Sandwich; Andet
ru: Тип J-образного крюка: Плоский; Заниженный; Обычный; Сэндвич; Другой
ja: Jカップタイプ: フラット; 低め; レギュラー; サンドイッチ; その他
lt-LT: Štangos laikiklio tipas: Plokščias; Nuleistas; Įprastas; Sluoksniuotas; Kita
ro-RO: Tip consolă J-cup: Plat; Coborât; Obișnuit; Sandwich; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta nosilca v obliki črke J: Ploščata; Spuščena; Običajna; Gumiran; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип J-образна кука: Плосък; Понижен; Обикновен; Сандвич; Други
en: J-cup type: Flat; Lowered; Regular; Sandwich; Other
it: Tipo di J-Cup: Piatto; Ribassato; Regular; Sandwich; Altro
es: Tipo de J-Cup: Puro; Bajada; Regular; Sándwich; Otros
zh-CN: J 型钩类型: 扁平的; 降低; 普通; 三明治; 其他